Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 2.1 Location of Residential Gas Regulators and Gas Meters

39-2.1-1.
Location of residential gas regulators and gas meters.

Prior to the location or relocation of any residential gas regulator or gas meter, the public utility shall consult with the owner(s) of the property as to their preference concerning the most suitable location for such devices, and the public utility shall give preference to locations that are least visibly prominent.

The public utility is hereby prohibited from installing gas regulators and/or gas meters on the visible front of any residential property or visible sides of the property that face a public right-of-way, unless permitted to do so by the owner or unless it is determined that there exists no prudent and feasible alternative to such location. In high-pressure systems, the gas regulator may be located in an unobtrusive exterior location that is not visible from a public right-of-way.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

39-2.1-2.
Location of gas regulators and/or gas meters in historic districts.

The public utility is hereby prohibited from installing gas regulators or gas meters on the exterior of property located within a historic district, unless permitted to do so by the owner, and is hereby required to obtain a certificate of appropriateness from the historic district commission of any city or town that has been created by the city or town council in accordance with the provisions of chapter 24.1 of title 45, et seq.; provided, however, in high-pressure systems, the public utility may install gas regulators on the exterior of property, subject to the exterior location being approved by the owner and the historic district commission.

For the purposes of this section, “property located within a historic district” means “a certified historic structure” as defined in §

44-33.2-2(1)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 184, § 1.

39-2.1-3.
Obligations of residential property owners.

The owner(s) of any residential property within the interior of which a gas regulator or gas meter is located shall grant reasonable access to the public utility responsible for the maintenance of the regulator or meter in order to perform safety activities as required by law not less than every thirty-six (36) months. Any owner who denies the public utility access to the gas regulator or gas meter shall be subject to termination of service, and the public utility is hereby authorized to relocate the gas regulator or gas meter to the exterior of the property in accordance with the provisions of §

39-2.1-1

.

The owner(s) of property with interior gas regulators or gas meters shall be required to sign a consent form agreeing to the terms set forth in subsection (a).

The owner(s) of residential property are hereby authorized to paint exterior gas regulators, but not the regulator vents, and gas meters in order to blend with color of the property, and may landscape in front of the regulator and/or meter in order to conceal the location thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 184, § 1.